Missouri, session 2026, HB2799.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 620, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto nine new sections, to
be known as sections 620.5010, 620.5012, 620.5014, 620.5016, 620.5018, 620.5020,
620.5022, 620.5024, and 620.5026, to read as follows:
620.5010. As used in sections 620.5010 to 620.5026, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of economic development;
(2) "Grant", a grant to a small business under the program;
(3) "Program", the Missouri small business property crime prevention grant
program established in section 620.5012;
(4) "Small business", a for-profit, independently owned enterprise consisting of
fewer than fifty full-time or part-time employees.
620.5012. 1. Subject to appropriation, the department of economic development
shall establish the "Missouri Small Business Property Crime Prevention Grant
Program" to provide grants to small businesses in this state to improve their safety
and security through physical security upgrades and to assist small businesses with costs
associated with repairing damage caused during the commission of property crimes.
2. The department shall award grants for each fiscal year beginning with grants
for fiscal year 2028 and ending with grants for the fiscal year immediately preceding the
fiscal year in which the program sunsets under section 620.5026. All grants shall be
awarded from the fund established under section 620.5022.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2799 2
3. The total amount of grants that may be awarded to a single small business
under the program in any one fiscal year shall not exceed one thousand dollars.
620.5014. 1. Any small business seeking a grant under the program shall submit
an application to the department at least sixty days before July first of the fiscal year for
which the grant is sought.
2. A small business shall be eligible for a grant if the small business:
(1) Is located within this state;
(2) Submits a detailed grant application that outlines the specific needs of the
small business and how the funds will be used to address those needs; and
(3) Provides a cost breakdown of the proposed improvements or repairs,
including any security systems and structural renovations.
620.5016. Any small business awarded a grant shall use the grant moneys solely
for:
(1) Enhanced security measures, including the installation of surveillance
systems, access control systems, lighting, and alarm systems;
(2) The remodeling or redesigning of small business storefronts to improve
security and prevent unauthorized access; or
(3) Assistance with costs associated with repairing damage caused during the
commission of a property crime.
620.5018. 1. The department shall establish a review committee to evaluate all
grant applications based on the following criteria:
(1) The severity of the security needs of the small business;
(2) The extent of the damage for which repairs are needed;
(3) The feasibility of the proposed use of grant funds; and
(4) The demonstrated ability of the small business to complete the proposed
security improvements within a reasonable time frame.
2. The department shall award grants based on the review committee's
evaluation and shall notify small businesses of their award status within thirty days
after the date on which the grant applications were due.
620.5020. 1. Any small business that receives a grant under the program shall
submit an annual report to the department detailing:
(1) The progress made in implementing the funded repairs or security measures;
and
(2) Any challenges encountered in executing the repairs or security
improvements.
2. Any small business that receives a grant for repairs or security upgrades shall
complete the repairs or security upgrades within eighteen months of receipt of the grant.

HB 2799 3
The department may revoke the remaining funds allocated under a grant to a small
business that fails to meet this deadline.
620.5022. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri Small
Business Property Crime Prevention Program Fund", which shall consist of moneys
appropriated to it by the general assembly and any gifts, contributions, grants, or
bequests received from federal, private, or other sources. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely to award grants under the
program.
2. The provisions of section 33.080 relating to the transfer of unexpended
balances to the general revenue fund shall not apply to the fund until June thirtieth of
the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the program sunsets, at
which time the unexpended balance in the fund shall be transferred to general revenue
and the fund shall be abolished.
3. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
620.5024. The department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of
sections 620.5010 to 620.5026. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
620.5026. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under sections 620.5000 to
620.5024 shall automatically sunset six years after the effective date of sections 620.5000
to 620.5024 unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) Sections 620.5010 to 620.5026 shall terminate on September first of the
calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under sections 620.5010 to 620.5026 is sunset.
✔